dictsource/da_rules
// general rule sp/st/sk + o + t: V
  L08r) o (t       ?V        // skrot
        o (tL11++  o         // skrote, blote, pote, botaniker
  L08r) o (tL04    o         // skrotum
 _mask) o (t       '?V       // stressed
   L08) o (tL04    ?o        // followed by front vowel: o - skotøj
  disk) o          ?o        // diskotek
  kach) o (t       '?V       //

// general rule o + frontal consonant: [V]
        o (L03K+   ?V        // Olga, Volga, vold, vod, od, volt, polstre
     s) o (d+      ?o        // sod, løbesod
        o (lsen+   ?o        // name
     k) o (d+      ?o        // omkodning
   gaj) o (l       '?o       // candy
  symb) o (l       ?o        // sexsymbol
 bornh) o (lm      '?V       //
   L08) o (l+      o         // skole, spole, spol
     t) o (lk      ?V        // mistolke
     p) o (l+      ?o        // nordpolen, politi, interpol
     p) o (l_      ?o        //
     p) o (lsk     ?o        // polsk
     p) o (lt      ?V        // polterabend
     @) o (lsk     '?o       // katolsk, symbolsk
melank) o (lsk     '?o       //
  wimp) ole        Owl       // name
    st) o (d_      ?o        //
   L09) o (d+      ?o        // mod
     m) o (de+     o         // modefænomen
     m) oder       ?or       // pronounced like "mor"
     m) oderen     ?o3-Vn    // pronounced like "moren"
     m) oder (@    o:DV      // compunds - moderkage
    _m) oder (ne   ?od'?Er
hyperm) oder (ne   ?od?Er
    _m) oder (ni   ?od'?Er   // modernisere
  form) o (de      o         // formoder
   anm) oder       oDV
     l) o (L03+    ?o        // forlod, blod, efterlod
    fl) od (+      ?oD       // floddal - short o
    fl) o (den     ?o        // short o
    fl) o (der     o         // long o
     j) o (d+      ?o        //
     j) odle       ?Vdl@-    //
 jordl) o (d       ?V        //
     l) o (dtræk   ?V        // lodtrækning
trukket_l) o (d    ?V        //
træk_l) o (d       ?V        //
trække_l) o (d     ?V        //
trækker_l) o (d    ?V        //
trækkes_l) o (d    ?V        //
trak_l) o (d                 //
     r) o (d+      ?o        //
    br) o (d+      ?V        //
   _br) o (dy      0w        // name
    br) o (der     o         //
  forl) o (ds      ?V        // PP
     g) o (d+      o         //
     g) o (dt+     ?V        //
     g) o (tte     ?V
    sk) o (t       ?V        // Skotland
    sk) o (tøj     ?o        //
     g) odfather   VdfADV    //
     b) o (d+      ?o        // isbod
  camb) o (dj      'o        // Cambodja
     b) ody        ?Vdi      // bodystocking
     b) odybuilder VdibildV  // bodybuilder
    _k) o (d+      o         // kodning
    sk) o (d+      ?V        //
     k) o (de++    o         // sikkerhedskode, tidskode
     l) odret (+   VDr&#t    //

// general rule o + velar + front vovel: [o]
        o (L01L04  ?o        // okular
     C) o (kL04+   ?o        //  kokosnød, dokument
   rok) o (ko      'V        // stressed
    Cr) o (L01L04+ ?0        //  frokost
    ch) o (k+      ?V        //
    ch) o (ko+     ?o        // chokolade
     k) okon       ok'?VN    // stressed

// general rule o + p/b/d + front vowel: [o]
        o (L06L04+ ?o        // topografi, utopi, opinion
        o (pofre+  ?V        // opofrelse
        o (pildne+ ?V        //

// general rule o + p/b: [V]
        o (L06+    ?V        // op, opdrage, obstruere
        o (L06%+   ?V        // oppe - short
     n) o (pre     ?o
kommand) o         ?o        // kommandobroen
     s) ophia      ?of'i&    // name
        o (pposit  ?o        // opposition
        o (L06L11+ ?o        // oktober, global, Robert, oberst
  psyk) o (+       ?o        // psykogen
        o (pefter+ ?V        //
        o (parbejde+ ?V      //
     j) o (b@      ?V        // jobannonce
        o (pad+    ?V        // opad
     b) o (pæl     ?o        //
     k) o (par     ?V        // koparret
   L10) o (L06rL11 o         // kobra
   L02) o (L06le+  ?V        // boble
   L02) o (L06%e++ ?V        // dobbel
     C) o (L06L04++ ?o       // monopol, mobil
     p) o (pidol++ ?V        // popidol
        o (bbA+++  ?V        // hobby, snobbet, snobbede
    st) o (p++     ?V        // stopur
     k) o (bber+++ ?O        //
  selv) o (p       ?V        // selvoptaget
    _r) o (bin++   ?V        // Robin Hood
    _r) oby (n++   ?Vbe      // name
    pr) o (ble     ?o        // problem
     r) o (L06L05+ ?o        // europæer, propan
    le) o (par     ?o'       // leopard
   cle) o (patra   '?o       //
  nark) o (C       ?o        // narkobranchen
  mikr) o          ?o        // mikroprocessor
     h) o (b+      ?o        // menneskehob
    Cn) o (L06++   ?o        // knob, knop, knoppen
   gal) o (C       '?V       // galoche, galop - stressed
    dr) o (sche    ?V        //
     r) o (che     ?V        // broche
   gal) o (ppere   ?o        //
  kykl) o (p       '?o       //

// general rule l + o + t: [V]
     l) o (t       ?V        // blot, plot, kaskelot
_kompl) o (t       '?V       // stressed
_kaskel) o (t      '?V       // stressed
  merl) ot         '?o       // grape
   kal) o (t       '?V       // stressed
     l) o (tus     o:        //
   pil) o (t       ?o        // autopilot
   kil) o (+       ?o        // kiloton, kilovis
   zel) o (t       '?o       // stressed
   pel) oton       ?ot'?VN

    Ca) o (s       ?V        // kaos Laos
   L08) o (f++     ?V        // stof
    sk) o (fab     ?o        // skofabrik
  kask) o          ?o        // kaskoforsikring
    tr) o (CL04    ?o        // antropolog, tropisk, troperne
 fortr) o (lig     ?o        //
     _) o (mC      ''?V      // omgang, omformulere
     _) o (mar     ?V        // omarrangere, omarbejde
        o (madresse ?V       // omadressere
     _) oman       ?om'&n    // Oman - stressed
        o (ms      ?V        // pladeomslag
        o (mråd    ?V        // katastrofeområde
        o (mtale   ?V        // presseomtale
        o (megn    ?V        //
        o (mk      ?V        // deromkring
     k) o (nC      ?V        // konfirmand, konfekt,  konkurrence
     C) o (sCL11++ ?V        // fosfat, koster, moster, foster, floskel
   eur) o          ?o        (+++ // neuroskanner
  porn) o (++      ?o
   col) osseum     ?os'E?Om
    fr) o (sne     ?o        // fastfrosne
    tr) o (sretning ?o       //
    tr) o (sbekend ?o        // trosbekendelse
    fl) o (s       ?V        // floskler
    kl) o (stre    ?V        // klostret
    pr) o (sp+     ?o        // prospekt
     m) o (ske+    ?o        //
     k) o (steskaft ?o       //
     k) o (steskab ?o        //
     k) osh (er+   oS        //
    kr) o (s       ?o        // krostue
    kr) o (snak    ?o        //
  hydr) o          ?o        // hydrostatisk
  test) o (steron  ?o        //
rekogn) o (scere   ?o        //
    tr) os (samfund ?os      //
  metr) o (++      ?o        // metrostation
    tr) o (ld      ?V        // charmetrold
   bek) o (st      ?V        // bekostning
        o (sCL04   ?V        // osmose
     d) o (ssier   ?o
  kosm) o (s       ?V        // kosmos
 tjekk) o (slov    ?o        // Tjekkoslovakiet
 heter) o          ?o        // heterosvin
    sh) osh (one   ?oS'      // shoshoneindianere
        o (stindi  ?o        // Ostindien
     r) oscoe      ?Vsk?Ow   // Roscoe - name
     k) o (stL04   ?o        // kostume
    Cr) o (sk++    ?o        // troskab, kroskænk
     n) o (s_      ?V        // nos nu ikke i det
     g) o (slav+   ?o        // Jugoslavien
     h) o (spit    ?o        // hospital
     p) o (styr+   ?V'       //
        o (sko+    o         // otoskop, mokroskopi
    sk) o (sværte  ??o       //

// general rule: consonant + o + m:[V]
     C) o (m       ?V        // tomhændet, kedsomhed, tomt, udenoms
     C) o (mL04    ?V        // bomuld
  salt) o (mor     ?o        // saltomortale
     r) o (mulus   ?o        // name
    at) o (m       ?o        // iltatom
     C) o (mL11    ?o        // tomat
    ar) o (ma      '?o       // stressed
     h) o (L09L04+ ?o        // homo, honorær
     r) o (mCL05   ?o        // brombær TEST
 syndr) o (m       ?o        // stresssyndrom
     r) o (mkage   ?V
    Cr) o (mL04    ?o        // promotor
    tr) o (mme+    ?o        //
    fr) o (m       ?V        //
    fr) o (ma      ?o        // fromage
    tr) o (m       ?o        // trompet
    on) o (m       ?o        // økonomi
     n) o (mi      ?o        // nominere
 _økon) o (m_      '?o       // stressed
_hæmat) o (m       '?o
     c) omeback    ?Vmb'?&k  //
    _p) ommes (_   %?Vm      // pommes frites
    _p) omme (_    %?Vm      // pomme frite(s)

// general rule: labial (+r) + o + st: [V]
   L02) ost        ?Vsd      // opfostre, moster, post, frost
    fr) o (st++    ?V        // frost
    br) o (sten    ?o        //

// exceptions
     p) o (stmod   ?O        // postmoderne
     p) o (stej+   %?o       // leverpostej
     p) o (sttrau  ?o        // posttraumatisk
    pr) o (sti     ?o        // prostitueret
   nab) o (++      ?o        // nabostat

     s) o (mal     ?o'       // Somalia
    gn) o (m       ?o        //
    kr) o (m       ?o        // krom
    _l) o (s       ?V        // los
    _p) o (t_      ?V        //
  fall) o (s       ?V        //
  _kol) o (s       '?V       // kolos - stressed
   kol) o (st      ?o        // kolostomi
    st) o (mL04    ?o        // stomi
   kol) o (ssa     ?o        // kolossal
     k) o (ntor    ?o        //
     h) o (spice   ?V        // hospice
     v) od (ka     ?Vd       //
        o (ttawa   ?V        //
  term) o (sta     ?o        // termostat
     r) o (st++    o         // rost, skamrost, prostitueret, roste
    pr) o (stata   ?V        // prostata
     f) oged       o:@-D     // silent g
  bank) o (sp      ?o        // bankospil
     k) o (sko     ?o        // bronkoskop
   kok) o (s       ?o        // kokosnød
     k) o (st_     ?o        // kost (broom) Problem with kost = food
skrap_k) o (st     ?V        //
     k) o (stskole ?V        //
     k) o (stplan  ?V        //
     k) o (stråd   ?V        //
     k) o (stvane  ?V        //
     k) o (stpris  ?V        //
     k) o (sttilskud ?V      //
hverdagsk) o (st   ?V        //
sundhedsk) o (st   ?V        //
     k) o (st_og_logi ?V     // board and lodging
     k) o (stbar   ?V        //
helsek) o (st      ?V        //
  frok) o (st      ?V        //
        omko (st   ?Vmk?V    // omkostninger, leveomkostninger
     k) otele (t   Vt@-l'E   // svinekotelet
  boyk) o (t       ?V        V         // boycotte
     h) o (st++    ?o        // host
     h) o (ste++   o         // hoste
    fC) o (t       ?V        // flot, fjot
    fC) o (tL04    ?o        // flotille
